Utah statutes.
58-16a-306.   Contact lens prescription -- Qualifications.

(1)  An optometrist or physician issuing a contact lens prescription shall:

(a)  be licensed under this title to practice in Utah;

(b)  ensure the final contact lens prescription is accurate;

(c)  present a written copy of the prescription to the patient after fitting; and

(d)  provide a copy of the patient's contact lens prescription to a person who sells contact lenses upon the request of the patient or the person selling the contact lenses.

(2)  An optometrist or physician may not be held liable as a result of providing a prescription to a patient as required by Subsection (1).

(3)  Application of the provisions of this section shall be consistent with 45 C.F.R. Parts 160 and 164, Standards for Privacy of Individually Identifiable Health Information.

